tests/v_ту_del.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "The verb ту":
    ту<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : тӑватӑп
    ту<v><tv><pres><p2><sg> : тӑватӑн
    ту<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : тӑватӑть
    ту<v><tv><pres><p1><pl> : тӑватпӑр
    ту<v><tv><pres><p2><pl> : тӑватӑр
    ту<v><tv><pres><p3><pl> : тӑваҫҫӗ
    ту<v><tv><past><p1><sg> : турӑм
    ту<v><tv><past><p2><sg> : турӑн
    ту<v><tv><past><p3><sg> : турӗ
    ту<v><tv><past><p1><pl> : турӑмӑр
    ту<v><tv><past><p2><pl> : турӑр
    ту<v><tv><past><p3><pl> : турӗҫ
    ту<v><tv><imp><p1><sg> : тӑвам
    ту<v><tv><imp><p2><sg> : ту
    ту<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : тутӑр
    ту<v><tv><imp><p1><pl> : тӑвар
    ту<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : тӑвӑр
    ту<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : туччӑр
    ту<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : тӑвӑп
    ту<v><tv><fut><p2><sg> : тӑвӑн
    ту<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : туӗ
    ту<v><tv><fut><p1><pl> : тӑвӑпӑр
    ту<v><tv><fut><p2><pl> : тӑвӑр
    ту<v><tv><fut><p3><pl> : тӑвӗҫ
    ту<v><tv><cond><p1><sg> : тӑвӑттӑм
    ту<v><tv><cond><p2><sg> : тӑвӑттӑн
    ту<v><tv><cond><p3><sg> : тӑвӗччӗ
    ту<v><tv><cond><p1><pl> : тӑвӑттӑмӑр
    ту<v><tv><cond><p2><pl> : тӑвӑттӑр
    ту<v><tv><cond><p3><pl> : тӑвӗччӗҫ
    ту<v><tv><opt><p1><sg> : тӑвӑпин
    ту<v><tv><opt><p2><sg> : тӑвӑсӑн
    ту<v><tv><opt><p3><sg> : тӑвин
    ту<v><tv><opt><p1><pl> : тӑвӑпӑрин
    ту<v><tv><opt><p2><pl> : тӑвӑсӑр
    ту<v><tv><opt><p3><pl> : тӑвӗҫин
    ту<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><sg> : тӑвaятӑп
    ту<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><sg> : тӑвaятӑн
    ту<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><sg> : тӑвaятӑть
    ту<v><tv><abil><pres><p1><pl> : тӑвaятпӑр
    ту<v><tv><abil><pres><p2><pl> : тӑвaятӑр
    ту<v><tv><abil><pres><p3><pl> : тӑвaяҫҫӗ
